Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.803

Referendum—Submittal—Explanatory statement—Voters' pamphlet—Voting procedures—Canvassing and certification—Reimbursement of counties for costs—No other elections on stadium and exhibition center—1997 c 220.

(1) The secretary of state shall submit sections 101 through 604, chapter 220, Laws of 1997 to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at a special election to be held in this state on or before June 20, 1997, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation. The special election shall be limited to submission of this act to the people.

(2) The attorney general shall prepare the explanatory statement required by *RCW 29.81.020 and transmit that statement regarding the referendum to the secretary of state no later than the last Monday of April before the special election.

(3) The secretary of state shall prepare and distribute a voters' pamphlet addressing this referendum measure following the procedures and requirements of **chapter 29.81 RCW, except that the secretary of state may establish different deadlines for the appointment of committees to draft arguments for and against the referendum, for submitting arguments for and against the referendum, and for submitting rebuttal statements of arguments for and against the referendum. The voters' pamphlet description of the referendum measure shall include information to inform the public that ownership of the KingDome may be transferred to the public stadium authority and that the KingDome will be demolished in order to accommodate the new football stadium.

(4) A county auditor may conduct the voting at this special election in all precincts of the county by mail using the procedures set forth in ***RCW 29.36.121 through 29.36.139.

(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of ****RCW 29.62.020, the county canvassing board in each county shall canvass and certify the votes cast at this special election in that county to the secretary of state no later than the seventh day following the election. Notwithstanding the provisions of ****RCW 29.62.120, the secretary of state shall canvass and certify the returns from the counties no later than the ninth day following the special election.

(6) The secretary of state shall reimburse each county for the cost of conducting the special election in that county in the same manner as state primary and general election costs are reimbursed under ****RCW 29.13.047 (1) and (3).

(7) No other state, county, or local election shall be required or held on any proposition related to or affecting the stadium and exhibition center defined in RCW 36.102.010.

[ 1997 c 220 s 607 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]
Referendum Bill No. 48 was approved by the electorate at the June 17, 1997, election.

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 29.81.020 was repealed by 1999 c 260 s 13.

**(2) Chapter 29.81 RCW was recodified as chapter 29A.32 RCW pursuant to 2003 c 111 s 2401, effective July 1, 2004.

***(3) RCW 29.36.121, 29.36.124, 29.36.126, and 29.36.130 were recodified as RCW 29.38.020, 29.38.040, 29.38.050, and 29.38.060, respectively, pursuant to 2001 c 241 s 25. RCW 29.36.122 and 29.36.139 were repealed by 2001 c 241 s 24. RCW 29.38.020, 29.38.040, 29.38.050, and 29.38.060 were subsequently recodified as RCW 29A.48.020, 29A.48.040, 29A.48.050, and 29A.48.060, respectively, pursuant to 2003 c 111 s 2401, effective July 1, 2004. RCW 29A.48.020, 29A.48.040, 29A.48.050, and 29A.48.060 were subsequently repealed by 2011 c 10 s 86.

****(4) RCW 29.62.020, 29.62.120, and 29.13.047 were recodified as RCW 29A.60.160, 29A.60.250, and 29A.04.420, respectively, pursuant to 2003 c 111 s 2401, effective July 1, 2004.

Effective date—1997 c 220 ss 606 and 607: See note following RCW 36.102.802.